Vermont, session 2025-2026, H398.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 10 V.S.A. chapter 12 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 12. VERMONT ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY
* * *
§ 212. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
* * *
(6) “Eligible facility” or “eligible project” means any industrial,
commercial, or agricultural enterprise or endeavor approved by the Authority
that meets the criteria established in the Vermont Sustainable Jobs Strategy
adopted by the Governor under section 280b of this title used in a trade or
business whether or not such business is operated for profit, including land and
rights in land, air, or water; buildings; structures; machinery; and equipment of
such eligible facilities or eligible projects, except that an eligible facility or
project shall not include the portion of an enterprise or endeavor relating to the
sale of goods at retail where such goods are manufactured primarily out of
State, and except further that an eligible facility or project shall not include the
portion of an enterprise or endeavor relating to housing unless otherwise
authorized in this chapter. Such enterprises or endeavors may include:
* * *
VT LEG #383909 v.1

No. 26 Page 2 of 33
2025
(T) Any capital improvement; purchase of receivables, property,
assets, commodities, bonds, or other revenue streams or related assets; working
capital program or liability; or other insurance program.
* * *
(9) “Insurance contract” means a contract insuring mortgage payments
under subchapter 2 of this chapter. [Repealed.]
* * *
(11) “Maturity date,” as used in subchapter 2 of this chapter, means the
date upon which the note or other evidence of indebtedness secured by a
mortgage would be extinguished if paid in accordance with the mortgage
payments. [Repealed.]
(12) “Mortgage,” as used in subchapter 2 of this chapter, means a first
mortgage upon an eligible facility given by a mortgagor, as herein defined, to
secure the repayment of amounts borrowed to pay costs of a project.
[Repealed.]
(13) “Mortgage payments,” as used in subchapter 2 of this chapter,
means the periodic payments called for by a mortgage that shall cover lease
land rentals, if any, mortgage insurance premiums, interest, installments of
principal, taxes and assessments, hazard insurance payments, and any other
payments called for in the mortgage. [Repealed.]
VT LEG #383909 v.1

No. 26 Page 3 of 33
2025
(14) “Mortgagee,” as used in subchapter 2 of this chapter, means the
original lender under a mortgage and its successors and assigns, if approved by
the Authority. [Repealed.]
(15) “Mortgagor,” as used in subchapter 2 of this chapter, means the
original borrower under a mortgage or a security agreement and its successors
and assigns, if approved by the Authority. [Repealed.]
* * *
§ 213. AUTHORITY; ORGANIZATION
* * *
(c) The Authority shall elect a chair from among its appointed members,
and a vice chair and treasurer other officers from among its members and shall
employ a manager who shall hold office at the Authority’s pleasure and who,
unless he or she the individual is a member of the classified service under 3
V.S.A. chapter 13, shall receive such compensation as may be fixed by the
Authority with the approval of the Governor. A quorum shall consist of eight
members. Members disqualified from voting under section 214 of this title
shall be considered present for purposes of determining a quorum. No action
of the Authority shall be considered valid unless the action is supported by a
majority vote of the members present and voting and then only if at least five
members vote in favor of the action.
* * *
VT LEG #383909 v.1

No. 26 Page 4 of 33
2025
(i) The Authority shall study and report back to the Legislature no later
than January 15, 1989 on the feasibility of hiring full-time counsel in lieu of
retaining outside counsel. [Repealed.]
§ 214. MEMBERS; DISQUALIFICATION
A member of the Authority may not participate in any decision:
* * *
(2) Upon any insurance contract under subchapter 2 of this chapter or
loan under subchapter 5 of this chapter, if the member is a member, director,
trustee, employee, or officer of; or has any interest direct or indirect in; or
owns any stock, bonds, or other liabilities issued by or authorized by the
prospective mortgagor, mortgagee, or tenant;
* * *
§ 215. MANAGER; DUTIES
The manager shall be the chief administrative officer of the Authority and
shall direct and supervise the administrative affairs and technical activities of
the Authority in accordance with any rules, regulations, and policies, and
procedures set forth by the Authority. In addition to any other duties, the
manager shall:
* * *
(4) work closely with the Agency of Commerce and Community
Development and provide assistance to the various divisions of that Agency
when requested to facilitate the planning and financing of projects; and
VT LEG #383909 v.1

No. 26 Page 5 of 33
2025
(5) make recommendations and reports, in cooperation with the Agency
of Commerce and Community Development, to the Authority on the merits of
any proposed project, on the status of local development corporations, and on
suitable industrial sites; [Repealed.]
(6) perform such other duties as may be directed by the Authority in the
carrying out of the purposes of this chapter.
§ 216. AUTHORITY; GENERAL POWERS
The Authority is hereby authorized:
(1) To sue and be sued in its own name and plead and be impleaded;
service of process upon it in any action shall be made by service upon the
Secretary of State either in hand or by leaving a copy of the process at his or
her the Secretary’s office.
* * *
(3) To adopt and from time to time amend bylaws, and rules, and
regulations for the calling and conduct of its meetings and for the conduct of
its affairs, including regulations rules, policies, and procedures relating to
applications for financial assistance and disclosure of information supplied to
it.
* * *
(10) To administer its own funds and to invest or deposit funds which
that are not needed currently to meet the obligations of the Authority.
* * *
VT LEG #383909 v.1

No. 26 Page 6 of 33
2025
(13) To cause to be incorporated in Vermont a nonprofit corporation that
will qualify as a State development company under Title 15 of the U.S. Code
15 U.S.C. § 695 and rules and regulations adopted promulgated pursuant
thereto. The voting members of the Authority shall be members of the
company and shall constitute the board of directors of the company. The
company shall have at least 14 other members selected by the members of the
Authority. The company shall be organized and operate under the nonprofit
corporation laws of the State of Vermont to the extent not inconsistent
herewith. The Authority shall have the power to contract with the company to
provide staff and management needs of the company. The Authority is
authorized to contribute to the capital of the company in an amount the
Authority determines is necessary and appropriate.
* * *
(15) To delegate to loan officers the power to review, approve, and
make loans under this chapter, subject to the approval of the manager, and to
disburse funds on such loans, subject to the approval of the manager as set
forth in the policies and procedures of the Authority.
* * *
§ 217. RECORDS; ANNUAL REPORT; AUDIT
(a) The Authority shall keep an accurate account of all its activities and of
all its receipts and expenditures. Information and records in connection with
an application for an insurance contract under subchapter 2 of this chapter shall
VT LEG #383909 v.1

No. 26 Page 7 of 33
2025
be preserved for three years after the application has been denied or, if the
application is accepted, for three years after the mortgage has been discharged
and thereafter until the Authority orders them destroyed.
* * *
(c) The Auditor of Accounts of the State and his or her the Auditor’s
authorized representatives may at any time examine the accounts and books of
the Authority, including its receipts, disbursements, contracts, funds,
investments, and any other matters relating to its financial statements.
* * *
§ 217a. APPLICATION
Among such other things as may be required by the Authority, any
application for financing or for mortgage insurance under this chapter shall
state in detail on the application the nature and purpose of the business and its
products for which the loan, or revenue bonds or mortgage insurance is are
intended to benefit.
* * *
§ 231. ASSISTANCE TO LOCAL DEVELOPMENT CORPORATIONS
Upon application of a local development corporation, the Authority may
loan money to that local development corporation, upon such terms and
conditions as it may prescribe, for the purpose of industrial park planning and
development, for constructing or improving a speculative building or small
business incubator facility on land owned or held under lease by the local
VT LEG #383909 v.1

No. 26 Page 8 of 33
2025
development corporation, for purchase or improvement of existing buildings
suitable for or which can be made suitable for industrial or small business
incubation facility purposes and for the purchase of land in connection with
any of the foregoing. Before the local development corporation receives such
funds for such purposes from the Authority, it shall give to the Authority
security for the repayment of the funds. The security shall be in such form and
amounts as the Authority may determine and shall, in each instance, include a
first mortgage on the land, or the leasehold, building, and appurtenances
financed by such funds. Loans by the Authority to local development
corporations for the construction of speculative buildings or improvements to
those buildings shall be repaid in full, including interest and other charges,
within 90 days after the building is occupied if the building is being sold, or
within five years after the property is occupied if the building is being leased,
or within such period of time deemed reasonable by the Authority. Loans by
the Authority to local development corporations for the construction, purchase,
or improvement of small business incubator facilities shall be repaid in full,
including interest and other charges, within ten 20 years after the property is
occupied.
* * *
§ 244. BONDS
* * *
VT LEG #383909 v.1

No. 26 Page 9 of 33
2025
(b) Bonds shall bear the manual or electronic signature of the treasurer of
the municipality and the manual, electronic, or facsimile signature or
signatures of the mayor or a majority of the selectboard or trustees as the case
may be. Interest coupons, if any, shall bear the facsimile signature of the
treasurer. If the municipality has a corporate seal, bonds shall bear the seal or
a facsimile of the seal. Bonds executed in accordance with this subchapter
shall be valid notwithstanding that before the delivery thereof and payment
therefor any or all of the persons whose signatures appear thereon shall have
ceased to hold office.
* * *
§ 253. STATE AUTHORITY PROJECTS
(a) The State of Vermont Authority may engage in projects within the state
State in accordance with the provisions of this subchapter. For the purposes of
this section and section 254 of this title:
(1) The word “municipality” as used in the sections of this subchapter
other than this section shall mean the “State of Vermont” “Authority”;
* * *
(b) For the purposes of engaging in a project, the Authority shall act in the
name of the State and on its behalf of the State as its agent and instrumentality
for the execution of financing documents, security documents, bonds, and
other appropriate instruments or for the taking of any action with respect to a
VT LEG #383909 v.1

No. 26 Page 10 of 33
2025
project financed in whole or in part by the issue of bonds under section 254 of
this title.
(c) Title to or possessory interest in any eligible facility that is financed in
whole or in part by the issue of bonds pursuant to section 254 of this title may
be taken and held in the name of the State Authority. In performing its
functions under this section, the Authority may exercise any and all powers
conferred upon municipalities by this subchapter, but the Authority shall not
execute any financing document, security document, or bond with respect to a
project until the Authority has made the findings required by section 246 of
this title.
* * *
§ 254. STATE AUTHORITY BONDS
* * *
(c) Bonds issued under this section shall bear the manual, electronic, or
facsimile signature of the manager or treasurer of the Authority and the manual
or facsimile signature of the Chair or Vice Chair of the Authority, or
authorized designee and agent; provided, however, that at least one of the
foregoing such signatures shall be manual unless the bonds are to be manually
authenticated by a bank or trust company serving as trustee for the bonds. The
details of the bonds shall be fixed by the signing officers in accordance with
section 244 of this title. Bonds shall be sold by the signing officers at public or
VT LEG #383909 v.1

No. 26 Page 11 of 33
2025
private sale, and the proceeds thereof shall be paid to the trustee, lender, or
disbursing agent under the security document that secures the bonds.
(d) No financing or security document, or bond, or other instrument issued
or entered into in the name and on behalf of the State under this subchapter
shall in any way obligate the State to raise any money by taxation or use other
funds for any purpose to pay any debt or meet any financial obligation to any
person at any time in relation to an eligible facility financed in whole or in part
by the issue of the Authority’s bonds under this subchapter, except from
monies received or to be received under a financing or security document
entered into under this subchapter or except as may be required by any other
provision of law. Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection, the State
may accept and expend with respect to an eligible facility any gifts or grants
received from any source in accordance with the terms of the gifts or grants.
* * *
(f) Bonds may be issued by the Authority under this subchapter for the
purpose of making loans to local development corporations for industrial park
planning and development, constructing, or improving a speculative building
or small business incubator facility on land owned or held under lease by the
local development corporation, purchase or improvement of existing buildings
suitable or that can be made suitable for industrial or business incubation
purposes, and purchase of land in connection with any of the foregoing.
VT LEG #383909 v.1

No. 26 Page 12 of 33
2025
(1) Before issuing bonds for construction of a speculative building or
small business incubator facility and the purchase of land in connection
therewith, the Authority shall make the determinations and incorporate in its
minutes the findings that:
(A) the project is within the scope of this chapter, will be of public
use and benefit, and may reasonably be expected to create new employment
opportunities;
(B) the proposed site for the speculative building or small business
incubator facility will be located on adequate land owned or to be acquired by
the local development corporation or leased by the local development
corporation on terms satisfactory to the Authority;
(C) an adequate access road from a public highway is provided to the
proposed site and that such utilities as water, sewer, and power facilities are
available, or will be available when the speculative building or small business
incubator facility is completed;
(D) the project plans comply with all applicable environmental,
zoning, planning, and sanitary laws and regulations of the municipality where
it is to be located and of the State of Vermont;
(E) the local development corporation is responsible and has
presented evidence to demonstrate its ability to carry out the project as
planned;
VT LEG #383909 v.1

No. 26 Page 13 of 33
2025
(F) evidence has been presented demonstrating the feasibility of the
site as a location for business, and additional evidence has been presented that
an adequate supply of labor is available within the labor market area to serve a
business located on the site;
(G) the local development corporation has made adequate provisions
for insurance protection of the building while it is unoccupied and suitable
arrangements have been made for fire protection and maintenance while it is
unoccupied;
(H) the project will be without unreasonable risk of loss to the
Authority, and the local development corporation is unable to secure on
reasonable terms the funds required for the project without the assistance of the
Authority;
(I) the financing and security documents contain provisions such that
under no circumstances is the State obligated directly or indirectly to pay
project costs; debt service; or expenses of operation, maintenance, and upkeep
of the facility except from bond proceeds or from funds received under the
financing or security documents, exclusive of funds received thereunder by the
State for its own use;
(J) neither the financing document nor the security document
purports to create any debt of the State with respect to the eligible facility,
other than a special obligation of the State under this chapter required by
section 232 of this title.
VT LEG #383909 v.1

No. 26 Page 14 of 33
2025
(2) Before issuing bonds for industrial park planning and development
and the purchase of land in connection therewith, the Authority shall make the
determinations and incorporate in its minutes the findings that:
(A) the proposed industrial park is on adequate land owned or to be
owned by the local development corporation or leased by the local
development corporation on terms satisfactory to the Authority;
(B) an adequate access road from a public highway is provided to the
proposed site, and utilities, including water, sewer, and power facilities, are
available or will be available for any future tenant located in the park;
(C) the total industrial park will be planned by architects and
engineers acceptable to the Authority;
(D) no more than 80 percent of the fair market value of the industrial
park, as shown by appraisal by an appraiser acceptable to the Authority, is to
be financed under the loan;
(E) the park project is within the scope of this chapter, will be of
public use and benefit, and may reasonably be expected to create new
employment opportunities;
(F) the park project complies with all applicable environmental,
zoning, planning, and sanitary laws and regulations of the municipality in
which it is to be located and of the State of Vermont;
VT LEG #383909 v.1

No. 26 Page 15 of 33
2025
(G) the local development corporation is responsible and has
presented evidence to demonstrate its ability to carry out the park project as
planned;
(H) evidence has been presented demonstrating the feasibility of the
site as a location for industry, and additional evidence has been presented that
an adequate supply of labor is available within the labor market area to serve
an industry located on the site;
(I) the park project will be without unreasonable risk of loss to the
Authority, and the local development corporation is unable to secure on
reasonable terms the funds required for the project without the assistance of the
Authority;
(J) the financing and security documents contain provisions such that
under no circumstances is the State obligated directly or indirectly to pay
project costs; debt service; or expenses of operation, maintenance, and upkeep
of the facility except from bond proceeds or from funds received under the
financing or security documents, exclusive of funds received thereunder by the
State for its own use;
(K) neither the financing document nor the security document
purports to create any debt of the State with respect to the eligible facility,
other than a special obligation of the State under this chapter required by
section 237 of this title.
VT LEG #383909 v.1

No. 26 Page 16 of 33
2025
(3) All determinations and findings made by the Authority pursuant to
this section shall be conclusive Financing and security documents shall contain
provisions such that under no circumstances is the State obligated directly or
indirectly to pay project costs; debt service; or expenses of operation,
maintenance, and upkeep of the facility except from bond proceeds or from
funds received under the financing or security documents, exclusive of funds
received thereunder by the State for its own use.
(4) Financing and security documents shall not create any debt of the
State with respect to the eligible facility, other than a special obligation of the
State under this chapter.
(g) Bonds issued by the Authority under this subchapter may be secured, in
whole or in part, by mortgage insurance under subchapter 2 of this chapter
upon the terms and conditions set forth in subchapter 2 and in this subsection.
Such insurance may be in the form of reinsurance or may be for the purpose of
creating a loan loss reserve, in a case where the bonds are also secured by the
mortgage insurance from another source. The principal amount of bonds so
secured outstanding at any time with respect to facilities of any one user, or
any related person, in any one municipality, shall not exceed $2,500,000.00.
For purposes of this subsection, the term “mortgagee” as used in subchapter 2
of this chapter shall mean the purchasers of the bonds, or where appropriate the
trustee under the security document; the mortgage payments to be insured shall
be those required to be made by the user under the financing document; and
VT LEG #383909 v.1

No. 26 Page 17 of 33
2025
bond proceeds, instead of being used to pay project costs directly, may be used
to purchase participation in loans originated by local banks or other responsible
financial institutions where the proceeds of such loans have been used to pay
project costs. In authorizing mortgage insurance to secure bonds, the
Authority shall make all of the findings and determinations set forth in
subsection 221(a) of this title, except that the principal of the mortgage cannot
exceed $2,500,000.00. In authorizing any bonds that are to be secured by
mortgage insurance, the Authority shall make all of the findings and
determinations set forth in section 246 of this title, and may make the findings
set forth in subdivisions 246(5) and (7) of this title, notwithstanding the fact
that the mortgage insurance will create a contingent liability of the Authority.
The creation of such contingent liability shall not be deemed to violate the
prohibition contained in subsection (d), and the statement required on each
bond that it does not constitute an indebtedness of the State may be modified to
refer to the mortgage insurance. Separate series of bonds all of which are
secured by mortgage insurance may be combined pursuant to subsection (e) of
this section, and the proceeds of any payment of such mortgage insurance may
be allocated and applied by the trustee for the benefit of the bondholders in
accordance with the terms of the security document providing for the
combined financing All determinations and findings made by the Authority
pursuant to this section shall be conclusive.
VT LEG #383909 v.1

No. 26 Page 18 of 33
2025
(h) The Authority is authorized to pledge security and to enter into security,
insurance, or other forms of credit enhancement. A pledge in any agreement
shall be valid and binding from the time such pledge shall be made without any
physical delivery or further act, and the lien of such pledge shall be valid and
binding as against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract, or
otherwise, irrespective of whether such parties have notice thereof. Any such
pledge shall be perfected by filing of the agreement in the records of the
Authority and no filing need be made under any other provision of law.
(i) The Authority may purchase any bond issued under this subchapter 4.
Subject to the terms of any agreement with the bondholders, the Authority may
hold, pledge, resell, or cancel any bond purchased under this paragraph, expect
that a purchase under this paragraph shall not cause the extinguishment of such
bond unless the Authority cancels the bond or otherwise certifies its intention
that the bond be extinguished.
(j) No designated member, director, officer, employee, or agent of the
Authority shall be liable personally on the bonds or any contract entered into
by the Authority or subject to any personal liability or accountability by reason
of the issuance of the bonds unless the personal liability or accountability is the
result of intentional misconduct.
VT LEG #383909 v.1

No. 26 Page 19 of 33
2025
Subchapter 5. Direct Mortgage Loans
§ 261. ADDITIONAL POWERS
In addition to powers enumerated elsewhere in this chapter, the Authority
may:
(1) Make loans secured by mortgages or other assets, which may be
subordinate to one or more prior mortgages or liens, upon application by the
proposed mortgagor obligor, who may be a private corporation, nonprofit
organization, partnership, person, or municipality financing an eligible project
described in subdivision 212(6) of this title, upon such terms as the Authority
may prescribe, for the purpose of financing the establishment or expansion of
eligible facilities. Such loans shall be made from the Vermont Jobs Fund
established under subchapter 3 of this chapter. The Authority may provide for
the repayment and redeposit of such loans as provided in this subchapter.
* * *
(3) Purchase prior mortgages secured loans and make payments on prior
mortgages secured loans on any eligible facility where the purchase or
payment is necessary to protect any loan previously made by the Authority. In
addition, the Authority may sell, transfer, convey, and assign any such prior
mortgage or security. Monies used by the Authority in the purchase of any
prior mortgages mortgage or security, or any payments thereon, shall be
withdrawn from the Vermont Jobs Fund, and any monies derived from the sale
VT LEG #383909 v.1

No. 26 Page 20 of 33
2025
of any prior mortgages mortgage or security shall be deposited by the
Authority in the Vermont Jobs Fund.
* * *
§ 262. FINDINGS
Before making any loan, the Authority shall receive from an applicant a
loan application in such form as the Authority may by regulation rule
prescribe, and the Authority, or the Authority’s loan officer pursuant to the
provisions of subdivision 216(15) of this title, shall determine and incorporate
findings in its minutes that:
(1) The project is within the scope of this chapter and will increase or
maintain employment and expand the economy of the State.
(2) The project plans comply with all applicable environmental, zoning,
planning, and sanitary laws and regulations of the municipality where it is to
be located and of the State of Vermont.
* * *
(5) The principal obligation of the Authority’s mortgage loan does not
exceed $5,000,000.00, which may be secured by land and buildings or by
machinery and equipment, or both, unless:
(A) an integral element of the project consists of the generation of
heat or electricity employing biomass, geothermal, methane, solar, or wind
energy resources to be primarily consumed at the project, in which case the
principal obligation of the Authority’s mortgage loan does not exceed
VT LEG #383909 v.1

No. 26 Page 21 of 33
2025
$6,000,000.00, which may be secured by land and by buildings or machinery
and equipment, or both; such principal obligation does not exceed 40 percent
of the cost of the project; and the mortgagor obligor is able to obtain financing
for the balance of the cost of the project from other sources as provided in the
following section; or
* * *
(6) The mortgagor obligor is responsible and able to manage its
responsibilities as mortgagor obligor and owner of the project.
(7) The mortgage loan has a satisfactory maturity date, in no case later
than 20 years from the date of the mortgage.
(8) The mortgagor obligor is unable to finance the project upon
reasonable terms without the assistance of the requested loan from the
Authority, or in the alternative, the granting of the loan will serve as a
substantial inducement for the establishment or expansion of an eligible project
within the State.
(9) The mortgagor obligor has made adequate provision for insurance
protection of the project while the loan is outstanding.
* * *
§ 263. MORTGAGE LOAN; LIMITATIONS
(a) When it has been determined by the Authority that the establishment or
expansion of a particular eligible facility will accomplish the public purposes
of this act, the Authority may contract to loan to the mortgagor obligor an
VT LEG #383909 v.1

No. 26 Page 22 of 33
2025
amount not in excess of 40 percent of the cost of such eligible facility. In
addition, the Authority shall have determined that the mortgagor obligor has
obtained from other independent and responsible sources, such as banks and
insurance companies financial institutions or otherwise, a firm commitment for
all other funds, over and above the loan of the Authority and such funds or
property as the local development corporation may hold, necessary for
payment of all of the cost of the project, and that the sum of all these funds,
together with any funds, machinery, and equipment to be provided by the
mortgagor obligor is adequate for the completion and operation of the project.
(b) Any loan of the Authority under this subchapter shall be for a period of
time and shall bear interest at such rate as determined by the Authority and
shall be secured by a mortgage on the eligible facility or a lien on its assets for
which the loan was made or upon the assets of a municipal communications
plant, including the net revenues derived from the operation thereof, or both.
The mortgage secured loan may be subordinate to one or more prior mortgages
loans, including the mortgage liens securing the obligation issued to secure the
commitment of funds from the independent and responsible sources and used
in the financing of the economic development project. Monies loaned by the
Authority shall be withdrawn from the Vermont Jobs Fund and paid over to the
mortgagor obligor in such manner as provided and prescribed by the rules and
regulations of the Authority. All payments of principal and interest on the
loans shall be deposited by the Authority in the Vermont Jobs Fund.
VT LEG #383909 v.1

No. 26 Page 23 of 33
2025
(c) Loans by the Authority for an eligible facility under this subchapter
shall be made only in the manner and to the extent provided in this section,
except, however, in those instances where an agency of the federal government
participates in the financing of an eligible facility by loan, grant, or otherwise.
When any federal agency participates, the Authority may adjust the required
ratio of financial participation by the local development corporation,
independent sources of funds, and the Authority in such manner as to ensure
the maximum benefit available by the participation of the federal agency.
Where any federal agency participating in the financing of an eligible facility
is not permitted to take as security a mortgage, the lien of which is junior to the
mortgage of the Authority, the Authority shall be authorized to take as security
for its loan a mortgage junior in lien to that of the federal agency.
* * *
§ 264. ACCELERATED REPAYMENT PROVISIONS
Any direct mortgage loan made on or after July 1, 1988 under this
subchapter shall be conditioned upon the maintenance of a reasonable level of
employment at the facility or facilities owned by the mortgagor obligor and
pledged as security for the loan. For the purposes of this section, a reasonable
level of employment shall be deemed not to have been maintained whenever a
mortgagor an obligor employing 50 or more employees at such facility or
facilities permanently transfers, within any three-year period, 50 percent or
more of those employees or employment positions to any out-of-state facility.
VT LEG #383909 v.1

No. 26 Page 24 of 33
2025
Upon breach of this condition, the Authority may declare all principal and
interest of the mortgage loan immediately due and payable and may commence
foreclosure on any property held as security for the mortgage loan or take any
other lawful steps to obtain payment.
* * *
§ 279c. VERMONT EXPORT FINANCE PROGRAM
* * *
(e) Any excess of revenues over expenses derived from this program shall
be deposited in the development fund Vermont Jobs Fund.
* * *
§ 280a. ELIGIBLE PROJECTS; AUTHORIZED FINANCING PROGRAMS
(a) The Authority may develop, modify, and implement any existing or
new financing program, provided that any specific project that benefits from
such program shall meet the criteria contained in the Vermont Sustainable Jobs
Strategy adopted under outlined in section 280b of this title, and provided
further that the program shall meet the criteria contained in the Vermont
Sustainable Jobs Strategy adopted under section 280b of this title. These
programs may include:
(1) the Mortgage Insurance Program, administered under chapter 12,
subchapter 2 of this title; [Repealed.]
* * *
VT LEG #383909 v.1

No. 26 Page 25 of 33
2025
(11) a program that would award grants made to eligible and qualified
recipients as directed by the Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets or the
Agency of Natural Resources for the purpose of funding water quality
initiatives approved by the agencies, provided that the maximum amount of
grants awarded by the Authority pursuant to the program shall not exceed
$1,340,238.00 in the aggregate; or
(12) loans to agricultural enterprises or endeavors administered by the
Authority under chapter 16A of this title and any programs created thereunder.
(b) This section shall not apply to the Job Start Program authorized by
chapter 12, subchapter 7 of this title, and the agricultural finance programs
authorized by chapter 16 of this title. [Repealed.]
§ 280b. THE VERMONT SUSTAINABLE JOBS STRATEGY
(a)(1) The Governor, with the advice of the Secretary of Commerce and
Community Development and the Authority, shall adopt a Vermont sustainable
jobs strategy for the State, in accordance with the provisions of this section
Before issuing any funds to an eligible facility or eligible project under section
280a of this title, the Authority shall make a determination that the facility or
project materially supports one of the following objectives:
(A) creating or sustaining employment opportunities for Vermonters
in proportion to the amount of financial assistance requested;
(B) providing quality employment at wage and benefit levels
sufficient to permit a reasonable standard of living by community standards,
VT LEG #383909 v.1

No. 26 Page 26 of 33
2025
and at levels that may contribute to bringing Vermont’s average wage up to or
above 100 percent of the national average wage rate;
(C) promoting employment opportunities in economically
disadvantaged areas and communities in the State;
(D) advancing the overall growth of wealth in the Vermont economy
by promoting the production and sale of goods and services with a substantial
Vermont content and those that utilize Vermont’s unique human and natural
resource base to markets outside of the State and nation, including visitors to,
and travelers through, the State;
(E) assisting the development of a business infrastructure that will
contribute to sustainable economic development, to include the provision of
necessary services, including shipping, warehousing, communications, repair
and maintenance, technical services, distribution, and dependent care,
particularly when intrastate capability in these areas can replace services
currently provided by out-of-state suppliers;
(F) encouraging economic development projects that reduce,
mitigate, or eliminate the effects of climate change, the pollution of land, air,
or water, or those that will interdict material within the State that, having
served its intended purpose, would otherwise enter the solid waste disposal
stream and that will cause the diversion of such material to useful purposes, or
that will reuse or recycle any such post-consumer material;
VT LEG #383909 v.1

No. 26 Page 27 of 33
2025
(G) encouraging commercial activity in the traditional downtown
areas of the State and promoting through appropriate commercial adaptation
the preservation of suitable buildings or structures that are historically or
aesthetically significant;
(H) encouraging economic development projects that are consistent
with and sensitive to the needs of the communities in which such projects are
located;
(I) promoting entrepreneurial activity, recognizing that some of those
that are the small businesses of today will be the large employers of tomorrow;
and
(J) aiding in the achievement of the economic development and
business growth strategies adopted by the Vermont Economic Progress
Council and the Vermont Department of Economic Development, wherever
possible providing assistance to those categories of enterprise that may be
designated as especially desirable for Vermont.
(2) All determinations and findings made by the Authority pursuant to
this section shall be conclusive.
(b)(1) The Vermont sustainable jobs strategy shall contain the criteria upon
which the Authority shall develop, modify, and implement its public financing
programs, and the criteria for determining whether investments should be made
in an eligible project. Such criteria shall include a requirement that, before
making any investment or other financial commitment, the Authority shall
VT LEG #383909 v.1

No. 26 Page 28 of 33
2025
determine that the proposed project is of public use and benefit and is without
unreasonable risk of loss to the Authority.
(2) In adopting the Vermont sustainable jobs strategy, the Governor
shall consider:
(A) the policies established in section 280 of this title; and
(B) the economic policy and economic development plan of the
State, as developed by the Economic Progress Council under subchapter 3 of
chapter 29 of this title The Authority may adopt such policies and procedures
necessary to define further any term or criterion used in this section or to set
specific standards by which to measure the extent to which any proposed
project meets the requirements of this section.
(c)(1) Before adopting the Vermont sustainable jobs strategy, the Governor
shall direct the Authority and the Secretary of Commerce and Community
Development to solicit information and recommendations from the people and
businesses of the State.
(2) After soliciting information and recommendations, the Authority and
the Secretary shall jointly develop a proposed Vermont sustainable jobs
strategy. In developing a proposed strategy, the Authority and the Secretary
shall consider how best to integrate Vermont’s economic, social, and
environmental values into a Vermont sustainable jobs strategy. The Authority
and the Secretary shall jointly present their proposed strategy to the House
VT LEG #383909 v.1

No. 26 Page 29 of 33
2025
Committee on Commerce and the Senate Committee on Economic
Development, Housing and General Affairs meeting in joint hearing.
(3) After legislative presentation, the Authority and the Secretary may
amend the proposed strategy, and shall present the proposed strategy as
amended to the Governor. The Governor may adopt the proposed strategy, or
may return the proposed strategy to the Authority and the Secretary for further
development and legislative presentation. After adoption of the Vermont
sustainable jobs strategy, any amendments to the strategy may be adopted by
the Governor in accordance with the process established by this section In
deciding whether to provide financial assistance to an applicant, the Authority,
after determining that a project meets its credit underwriting standards, shall
take into account the criteria outlined in this section, the overall benefits of the
project to the State and to the community in which it is proposed to be located,
the amount of assistance requested, and the availability of Authority resources
to fund the request.
* * *
Subchapter 15. Disaster Recovery Loan Fund
§ 280gg. DISASTER RECOVERY LOAN FUND
(a)(1) There is established within the Authority the Vermont Disaster
Recovery Loan Fund, referred to in this subchapter as “the Fund,” the purpose
of which is to enable the Authority to provide loans and other forms of
VT LEG #383909 v.1

No. 26 Page 30 of 33
2025
financial assistance to businesses, including agricultural and forest product
enterprises, after disasters.
(2) The Authority shall consult with the Secretary of Commerce and
Community Development; the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets;
and the Commissioner of Forests, Parks and Recreation in determining whether
funds shall be made available following a nondeclared disaster event impacting
areas of the State. A consultation shall not be required in the event of a
disaster declaration declared by the Governor or the President of the United
States.
(b) The Authority shall establish:
(1) policies and procedures for the Fund that the Authority determines
are necessary to carry out the purposes of this subchapter; and
(2) financing programs necessary to ensure timely delivery of financial
assistance after a disaster.
(c) The Authority shall limit the interest rates charged for loans provided
utilizing funds from the Disaster Recovery Loan Fund to rates necessary to
cover the costs of administering the Fund.
(d) This is a revolving loan program and any excess of revenues over
expenses derived from this program shall be deposited in the Fund.
(e) In determining whether to issue financial assistance from the Vermont
Disaster Recovery Loan Fund established by this subchapter 15, the Authority
VT LEG #383909 v.1

No. 26 Page 31 of 33
2025
shall consider whether a business has received disaster recovery financial
assistance from the State for the same disaster event.
Sec. 2. 10 V.S.A. § 234 is redesignated and amended to read:
§ 234 220a. THE VERMONT JOBS FUND
(a) There is hereby created the Vermont Jobs Fund, hereinafter called the
Fund, which shall be used by the Authority as a nonlapsing fund for the
purposes of subchapters 3, 5, 9, and 10 of this chapter. To it shall be charged
all operating expenses of the Authority not otherwise provided for and all
payments of interest and principal required to be made by the Authority under
this subchapter. To it shall be credited any appropriations made by the General
Assembly for the purposes of subchapters 3, 5, 9, and 10 of this chapter and all
payments required to be made to the Authority under subchapters 3, 5, 9, and
10 of this chapter, it being the intent of this section that the Fund shall operate
as a revolving fund whereby all appropriations and payments made thereto,
unless required to repay notes under the following section, may be applied and
reapplied for the purposes of subchapters 3, 5, 9, and 10 of this chapter.
Monies in the Fund may be loaned at interest rates to be set by the Authority
for the following:
(1) Loans to local development corporations under this subchapter,
provided that if the funds for any such loan are derived from the issue of notes
to the State Treasurer under section 235 of this chapter, the loan shall bear
interest at a rate not less than the rate on the notes chapter.
VT LEG #383909 v.1

No. 26 Page 32 of 33
2025
(2) Direct mortgage loans as described in subchapter 5 of this chapter.
(3) Loans for the financing of export activities under subchapter 9 of
this chapter.
(4) Other loans as the Authority may prescribe under subchapter 10 of
this chapter.
(b) In order to provide monies in the Fund for loans under this chapter, the
Authority may issue notes for purchase by the State Treasurer as provided in
section 235 of this chapter.
(c) Monies in the Fund may be loaned to the Vermont Agricultural Credit
Program to support its lending operations as established in chapter 16A of this
title at interest rates and on terms and conditions to be set by the Authority to
establish a line of credit in an amount not to exceed $100,000,000.00 to be
advanced to the Vermont Agricultural Credit Program to support its lending
operations as established in chapter 16A of this title.
(d)(c) Monies in the Fund may be loaned to the Vermont Small Business
Development Corporation to support its lending operations as established
pursuant to subdivision 216(14) of this title at interest rates and on terms and
conditions to be set by the Authority.
(e)(d) Monies in the Fund may be loaned to the Vermont 504 Corporation
to support its lending operations as established pursuant to subdivision 216(13)
of this title at interest rates and on terms and conditions to be set by the
Authority.
VT LEG #383909 v.1

No. 26 Page 33 of 33
2025
(f)(e) The Authority may loan money from the Fund to the Vermont
Sustainable Energy Loan Fund established under subchapter 13 of this chapter
at interest rates and on terms and conditions set by the Authority.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
Date Governor signed bill: May 21, 2025
VT LEG #383909 v.1